Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB715.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A public entity, including but not limited to state agencies, public universities,
public schools, and any other government-funded program, shall not require,
compel, or incentivize any program participant, student, employee, contractor, or
recipient of public funds to contact, lobby, or otherwise communicate with an
elected official for the purpose of advocating for a specific policy, legislation, or
political agenda.
(2) A public entity shall not condition participation in any program, receipt of any
benefit, or evaluation of performance on an individual's willingness to engage in
political advocacy or communication with elected officials.
(3) This section shall not be construed to prohibit:
(a) The teaching of civics, government, or public policy in an educational
setting, provided that participation in political advocacy or contacting
elected officials is voluntary and not a requirement for a grade or program
completion;
(b) Any individual from voluntarily expressing their personal views or engaging
in communication with elected officials; or
(c) Public employees or officials from providing, in a content neutral manner,
information about legislative processes or how to contact elected
representatives.
(4) A person who believes he or she has been compelled or coerced in violation of
this section may bring a civil action for declaratory or injunctive relief in the
Circuit Court of the county in which the violation occurred.
(5) A public entity found to have violated this section shall be subject to penalties,
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 4:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1885
including but not limited to loss of state funding and disciplinary action for any
responsible officials.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2025 4:56 PM Jacketed